Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-2304, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-2304. Advisory council; representation; duties A. The governor shall appoint a tourism advisory council which shall be composed of fifteen members who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. B. Members of the tourism advisory council shall include representatives from recreational and tourist attractions, lodging, restaurant or food and transportation industries, other tourism businesses and the general public. The council shall include one member from each of the six geographical planning areas of this state. The respective areas shall consist of the noted counties as follows: 1. Area 1 Maricopa. 2. Area 2 Pima. 3. Area 3 Apache, Coconino, Navajo and Yavapai. 4. Area 4 Mohave, La paz and Yuma. 5. Area 5 Gila and Pinal. 6. Area 6 Graham, Greenlee, Cochise and Santa Cruz. C. Of the members first appointed, three shall be appointed for a term ending June 30, 1979 and three each for terms ending one, two, three and four years thereafter. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of five years, except for an appointment to fill an unexpired term, which shall be for the remainder of the term. D. The council shall assist and advise the director in preparation of the budget and in establishment of policies and programs which that promote and develop tourism in this state. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.